District of Columbia statutes.
47-857.16

Tax abatements for nonprofit organizations locating in emerging commercial neighborhoods — Rules.

The Mayor, pursuant to Chapter 5 of Title 2, may issue rules to implement the provisions of §§ 47-857.11 through 47-857.16.

History

Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 7042(b), 57 DCR 6242

Section References

This section is referenced in § 47-857.13.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 7042(b) of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).